West Virginia, session 2025, SB348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of REvenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. State Lottery Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 2, 2024, authorized under the authority of §29-22D-4 of this code, modified by the Lottery Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 14, 2024, relating to the Lottery Commission (West Virginia Lottery Sports Wagering Rule, 179 CSR 09), is authorized.